test/src/morphology/adj-2.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.xfst
    App: lookup

# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

# Attribute is the same as pred. Adjectives that belong to NUORRA, TJIEGOS, GÅNTSAS, SNÁVES, SÁDNES, GOAVSOS, RÁDAS, ÁRMMOGIS and TSIBTSA. 

Tests:
  Adjective - senijlla: # NUORRA
    senijlla+A+Attr: senijlla
    senijlla+A+Sg+Nom: senijlla
    senijlla+A+Sg+Acc: senijlav
    senijlla+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: senijlap
    senijlla+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: senijlamus

  Adjective - skiermmá: # NUORRA
    skiermmá+A+Attr: skiermmá
    skiermmá+A+Sg+Nom: skiermmá
    skiermmá+A+Sg+Ine: skiermán
    skiermmá+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: skiermáp
    skiermmá+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: skiermámus

  Adjective - buorre: # NUORRA
    buorre+A+Attr: buorre 
    buorre+A+Sg+Nom: buorre 
    buorre+A+Sg+Gen: buore 
    buorre+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: buorep
    buorre+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: buoremus

  Adjective - destruktijvva: # NUORRA
    destruktijvva+A+Attr: destruktijvva 
    destruktijvva+A+Sg+Nom: destruktijvva
    destruktijvva+A+Sg+Ela: destruktijvas
    destruktijvva+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: destruktijvap
    destruktijvva+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: destruktijvamus


  Adjective - dievas: # TJIEGOS
    dievas+A+Attr: dievas
    dievas+A+Sg+Nom: dievas
    dievas+A+Sg+Gen: dievvasa
    dievas+A+Sg+Acc: dievvasav
    dievas+A+Sg+Ill: dievvasij
    dievas+A+Sg+Ine: dievvasin
    dievas+A+Sg+Ela: dievvasis
    dievas+A+Sg+Com: dievvasijn
    dievas+A+Pl+Nom: dievvasa
    dievas+A+Pl+Gen: dievvasij
    dievas+A+Pl+Acc: dievvasijt
    dievas+A+Pl+Ill: dievvasijda
    dievas+A+Pl+Ine: dievvasijn
    dievas+A+Pl+Ela: dievvasijs
    dievas+A+Pl+Com: dievvasij
    dievas+A+Ess: dievvasin
    dievas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: dievvasabbo
    dievas+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: dievvasamos

  Adjective - divtes: # TJIEGOS
    divtes+A+Attr: divtes
    divtes+A+Sg+Nom: divtes
    divtes+A+Sg+Acc: diktásav
    divtes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: diktásabbo
    divtes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: diktásamos

  Adjective - goasvos: # GOAVSOS
    goavsos+A+Attr: goavsos
    goavsos+A+Sg+Nom: goavsos
    goavsos+A+Sg+Gen: [goaksu,goaksusa]
    goavsos+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [goaksup,goaksusabbo]
    goasvos+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [goaksumus,goaksusamos]

  Adjective - måskas: # GÅNTSAS
    måskas+A+Attr: måskas
    måskas+A+Sg+Nom: måskas
    måskas+A+Sg+Com: moasskasijn
    måskas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: moasskasabbo
    måskas+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: moasskasamos

  Adjective - sáltes: # SÁDNES
    sáltes+A+Attr: sáltes
    sáltes+A+Sg+Nom: sáltes
    sáltes+A+Sg+Ine: sálltán
    sáltes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: sálltáp
    sáltes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: sálltámus

  Adjective - snáves: # SNÁVES
    snáves+A+Attr: snáves
    snáves+A+Sg+Nom: snáves
    snáves+A+Sg+Gen: snávvása
    snáves+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: snávvásabbo
    snáves+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: snávvásamos

  Adjective - rádas: # RÁDAS
    rádas+A+Attr: rádas
    rádas+A+Sg+Nom: rádas
    rádas+A+Sg+Acc: ráddasav
    rádas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: ráddasabbo
    rádas+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: ráddasamos

  Adjective - sjkærnja: # TSIBTSA
    sjkærnja+A+Attr: sjkærnja
    sjkærnja+A+Sg+Nom: sjkærnja
    sjkærnja+A+Sg+Com: sjkærnnjagijn
    sjkærnja+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: sjkærnnjagabbo
    sjkærnja+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: sjkærnnjagamos

  Adjective - gullogis: # ÁRMMOGIS
    sjkærnja+A+Attr: sjkærnja
    sjkærnja+A+Sg+Nom: sjkærnja
    sjkærnja+A+Sg+Com: sjkærnnjagijn
    sjkærnja+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: sjkærnnjagabbo
    sjkærnja+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: sjkærnnjagamos
